California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 paragraph (2), the county may request that the department consider other costs as adjustments to the cost containment limit. These costs would require departmental approval.

(e) “County” for purposes of this article means the following counties: Fresno, Merced, Orange, Placer, Sacramento, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz, Stanislaus, Tulare, and Yolo. Beginning in the 2019–20 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, “county” does not include the County of Yolo.

(f) “County indigent care health realignment amount” means the product of the health realignment amount times the health realignment indigent care percentage, as computed on a county-specific basis.

(g) “County savings
 determination process” means the process for determining the amount to be redirected in accordance with Section 17613.1, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17613.3.

(h) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(i) “Health realignment amount” means the amount that, in the absence of this article, would be payable to a county under Section 17603, as it read on January 1, 2012, Section 17604, as it read on August 1, 2017, Section 17606.20, as it read on August 1, 2019, and Section 17606.10, as it read on July 1, 2013, for the fiscal year that is deposited by the Controller into the local health and welfare trust fund health account of the county.

(j) “Health realignment indigent care percentage” means the county-specific percentage determined in accordance with the following, and established in accordance with the procedures described in subdivision (c) of Section 17613.3:

(1) Each county shall identify the portion of that county’s health realignment amount that was used to provide health
 services to the indigent, including the indigent program individuals, for each of the historical fiscal years, along with verifiable data in support thereof.

(2) The amounts identified in paragraph (1) shall be expressed as a percentage of the health realignment amount of that county for each fiscal year of the historical fiscal years.

(3) The average of the percentages determined in paragraph (2) shall be the county’s health realignment indigent care percentage.

(4) To the extent a county does not provide the information required in paragraph (1) or the department determines that the information required is insufficient, the amount under this subdivision shall be considered to be 85 percent.

(k) All references to “health services” or “health care
 services,” unless specified otherwise, shall exclude mental health and substance use disorder services.

(l) “Historical fiscal years” means the fiscal years 2008–09 to 2011–12, inclusive.

(m) “Imputed county low-income health amount” means the predetermined, county-specific amount of county general purpose funds assumed, for purposes of the calculation in Section 17613.3, to be available to the county for services to indigent program individuals. The imputed county low-income health amount shall be determined as set forth below and established in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 17613.3:

(1) For each of the historical fiscal years, an amount shall be determined as the annual amount of county general fund contribution provided for health services to the indigent, which does not include funds provided for mental health and substance use disorder services, through a methodology to be developed by the department, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties.

(2) If a year-to-year percentage increase in the amount determined in paragraph (1) was present, an average annual percentage trend factor shall be determined.

(3) The annual amounts determined in paragraph (1) shall be averaged and multiplied by the
 percentage trend factor, if applicable, determined in paragraph (2), for each fiscal year after the 2011–12 fiscal year through the applicable fiscal year. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the percentage trend factor determined in paragraph (2) is greater than the applicable percentage change for any year of the same period in the blended CPI trend factor, the percentage change in the blended CPI trend factor for that year shall be used. The resulting determination is the imputed county low-income health amount for purposes of Section 17613.3.

(n) “Indigent program costs” means the costs incurred by the county for purchasing, providing, or ensuring the availability of services to indigent program individuals during the fiscal year. The costs for mental health and substance use disorder services shall not be included in these costs.

(o) “Indigent program individuals” means all
 individuals enrolled in a county indigent health care program at any point throughout the fiscal year. If a county does not enroll individuals into an indigent health care program, indigent program individuals shall mean all individuals who used services offered through the county indigent health care program in the fiscal year.

(p) “Indigent program revenues” means self-pay payments made by or on behalf of indigent program individuals to the county for the services rendered in the fiscal year, but shall exclude revenues received for mental health and substance use disorder services.

(q) “Redirected amount” means the amount to be redirected in accordance with Section 17613.1, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17613.3.

(r) “Special local health funds” means the amount of the following county funds
 received by the county for health services to indigent program individuals during the fiscal year and shall include funds available pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement and related documents entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers during a fiscal year. The amount of the tobacco settlement funds to be used for this purpose shall be the greater of paragraph (1) or (2), less any bond payments and other costs of securitization related to the funds described in this subdivision.

(1) The amount of the funds expended by the county for the provision of health services to indigent program individuals during the fiscal year.

(2) The amount of the tobacco settlement funds multiplied by the average of the percentages of the amount of tobacco settlement funds that were allocated to and expended by the county for health
 services to indigent program individuals during the historical fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 67, Sec. 14.   (SB 104)   Effective July 9, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17613.3.

(a) For each fiscal year commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the amount to be redirected in accordance with Section 17613.1 shall be determined for each county as set forth in this section.

(1) The county’s revenues and other funds paid or payable for the fiscal year shall be comprised of the total of the following:

(A) Indigent program revenues.

(B) Special local health funds.

(C) The county indigent care health realignment amount.

(D) The imputed county
 low-income health amount.

(2) Indigent program costs incurred by the county for the fiscal year, not to exceed in total the cost containment limit, shall be subtracted from the sum in paragraph (1).

(3) The resulting amount shall be multiplied by 0.80, except for the 2013–14 fiscal year where the resulting amount shall be multiplied by 0.70.

(4) If the amount in paragraph (3) is a positive number, that amount, subject to paragraph (5), shall be redirected in accordance with Section 17613.1, except that for the 2013–14 fiscal year, the amount to be redirected shall not exceed the amount determined for the county for the 2013–14 fiscal year under subdivision (c) of Section 17603, as that amount may have been reduced by the application of Section 17610.5. If the amount determined in paragraph (3) is a negative number,
 the redirected amount shall be zero.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount to be redirected as determined in paragraph (4) for a fiscal year shall not exceed the county indigent care health realignment amount for that fiscal year.

(6) (A) The redirected amount shall be applied until the later of the following:

(i) June 30, 2023.

(ii) The beginning of the fiscal year following a period of two consecutive fiscal years in which both of the following occur:

(I) The total interim amount determined under subdivision (b) in May of the previous fiscal year is within 10 percent of the final, reconciled amount in subdivision (d).

(II) The final, reconciled amounts under subdivision (d) are within 5 percent of each other.

(B) After the redirected amount ceases as provided in subparagraph (A), a permanent redirected amount shall be established to be the amount determined by calculating the percentage that the redirected amount was in the last fiscal year of the operation of this article of the county’s health realignment amount of that same fiscal year, multiplied by the county’s health realignment amount of all subsequent years.

(b) Starting with the 2014–15 fiscal year, the department shall calculate an interim redirected amount for each county under subdivision (a) by the January immediately prior to the starting fiscal year, using the most recent and accurate data available. For purposes of the interim determinations, the cost containment
 limit shall not be applied. The interim redirected amount shall be updated in the May before the start of the fiscal year in consultation with each county and based on any more recent and accurate data available at that time. During the fiscal year, the interim redirected amount will be applied pursuant to Section 17613.1.

(c) The predetermined amounts or historical percentages described in subdivisions (j), (m), and (r) of Section 17613.2 shall each be established in accordance with the following procedure:

(1) By October 31, 2013, each county shall determine the amount or percentage described in the applicable subdivision, and shall provide this calculation to the department, supported by verifiable data and a description of how the determination was made.

(2) If the department disagrees with the county’s
 determination, the department shall confer with the county by December 15, 2013, and shall issue its determination by January 31, 2014.

(3) If no agreement between the parties has been reached by January 31, 2014, the department shall apply the county’s determination when making the interim calculations pursuant to subdivision (b), until a decision is issued pursuant to paragraph (6).

(4) If no agreement between the parties has been reached by January 31, 2014, the county shall submit a petition by February 28, 2014, to the County Health Care Funding Resolution Committee, established pursuant to Section 17600.60, to seek a decision regarding the historical percentage or amount to be applied in calculations under this section.

(5) The County Health Care Funding Resolution Committee shall hear and make a determination
 as to whether the county’s proposed percentage or amount complies with the requirements of this section based on the data and calculations of the county and any alternative data and calculations submitted by the department.

(6) The County Health Care Funding Resolution Committee shall issue its final determination within 45 days of the petition. If the county chooses to contest the final determination, the final determination of the committee will be applied for purposes of any interim calculation under subdivision (b) until a final decision is issued pursuant to de novo administrative review under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(d) (1) The data for the final calculations under subdivision (a) for the fiscal year shall be submitted by counties within 12 months after the conclusion of each fiscal year as required in Section 17613.4. The data shall be the
 most recent and accurate data from the county’s books and records pertaining to the revenues paid or payable, and the costs incurred, for services provided in the subject fiscal year. After consulting with the county, the department shall make final calculations using the data submitted pursuant to this paragraph by December 15 of the following fiscal year, and shall provide its final determination to the county. The final determination will also reflect the application of the cost containment limit, if any. If the county and the department agree, a revised recalculation and reconciliation may be completed by the department within six months thereafter.

(2) The Director of Health Care Services shall establish an expedited formal appeal process for a county to contest final determinations made under this article. No appeal shall be available for interim determinations made under subdivision (b). The appeals process shall include all of the
 following:

(A) The county shall have 30 calendar days, following the issuance of a final determination made under paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (1) of this subdivision, to file an appeal with the director. All appeals shall be governed by Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, except for those provisions of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code relating to accusations, statements of issues, statement to respondent, and notice of defense, and except as otherwise set forth in this section. All appeals shall be in writing and shall be filed with the State Department of Health Care Service’s Office of Administrative Hearings and Appeals. An appeal shall be deemed filed on the date it is received by the Office of Administrative Hearings and Appeals.

(i) An appeal shall specifically set forth each issue in dispute,
 including, but not limited to, any component of the determination, and include the county’s contentions as to those issues. A formal hearing before an Office of Administrative Hearings and Appeals Administrative Law Judge shall commence within 60 days of the filing of the appeal requesting a formal hearing. A final decision under this paragraph shall be adopted no later than six months following the filing of the appeal.

(ii) If the county fails to file an appeal within 30 days of the issuance of a determination made under this section, the determination of the department shall be deemed final and not appealable either administratively or to a court of general jurisdiction, except that a county may elect to appeal a determination under subdivision (c) within 30 days of the issuance of the County Health Care Funding Resolution Committee’s final determination under paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) or as a component of an appeal of the
 department’s final determination under paragraph (1) for the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(B) If a final decision under this paragraph is not issued by the department within two years of the last day of the subject fiscal year, the county shall be deemed to have exhausted its administrative remedies, and shall not be precluded from pursuing any available judicial review. However, the time period in this subdivision shall be extended by either of the following:

(i) Undue delay caused by the county.

(ii) An extension of time granted to a county at its sole request, or following the joint request of the county and the department.

(C) If the final decision issued by the department pursuant to this paragraph results in a different determination than that originally
 made by the department, then the Department of Finance shall adjust the original determination by that amount, pursuant to a process developed by the Department of Finance and in consultation with the California State Association of Counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 207.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17613.4.

(a) Beginning with the 2013–14 fiscal year, each county that has elected to participate in the County Savings Determination Process shall, within five months after the end of each fiscal year, be required to submit initial reports on both of the following:

(1) All revenue data required for the operation of Section 17613.3, including both of the following:

(A) Indigent program revenues.

(B) Special local health funds.

(2) All cost data required for the operation of Section 17613.3, including indigent program costs.

(b) Counties shall submit final reports of cost and revenue data identified in subdivision (a) to the department for each fiscal year no later than June 30 of the fiscal year ending one year after the subject fiscal year.

(c) The department shall develop, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, the methodologies used to determine the costs and revenues required to be reported and the format of the submissions.

(d) Reports submitted under this section shall be accompanied by a certification by an appropriate public official attesting to the accuracy of the reports.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further
 regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this article by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 208.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. CHILDREN WITH SPECIAL HEALTH CARE NEEDS [17700. - 17739.]



  CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations [17700. - 17700.]

17700.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Many children adjudicated dependents of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 and following are, because of abuse, neglect, or exploitation within the family environment, unable to remain safely in their own homes.

(b) Children requiring placement in foster care are, pursuant to Section 675(5)(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code, entitled to placement in the least restrictive, most family-like setting in close proximity to the parent’s home, consistent with the best interest and special needs of the child.

(c) A
 significant number of children adjudicated dependents of the juvenile court under Section 300 and following who require placement outside their own homes have special health care needs. Children with biological families who can provide health care services can be discharged from hospital care into home care when it has been determined that the child is medically stable.

(d) Children who have become dependents of the juvenile court may become, because of a lack of appropriate placement options, long-term boarders in hospitals or other health care institutions.

(e) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to support expansion of existing prevention and treatment programs designed to serve the parent and child with special health care needs which are administered by the State
 Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Social Services.

Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish a program to place children with special health care needs in specialized foster care homes, licensed, certified, or approved pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or approved pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 16519.5) of Chapter 5 of Part 4, wherein foster parents are trained by health care professionals, pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child being placed, or who is currently, in foster care.

It is further the intent of the Legislature to encourage, to the extent feasible, the placement of children with special health care needs with relatives trained by health care
 professionals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 113.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [17710. - 17710.]

17710.

Unless otherwise specified in this part:

(a) “Child with special health care needs” means a child, or a person who is 22 years of age or younger who is completing a publicly funded education program, who has a condition that can rapidly deteriorate resulting in permanent injury or death or who has a medical condition that requires specialized in-home health care, and who either has been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, has not been adjudged a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300 but is in the custody of the county welfare department, or has a developmental disability and is receiving services and case management from a regional center.

(b) “County” means a county welfare department.

(c) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(d) “Individualized health care plan team” means those individuals who develop a health care plan for a child with special health care needs in a specialized foster care home, as defined in subdivision (i), group home, or short-term residential therapeutic program, which shall include the child’s primary care physician or other health care professional designated by the physician, any involved medical team, and the county social worker or regional center worker, and any health care professional designated to monitor the child’s individualized health care plan pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 17731,
 including, if the child is in a certified home, the registered nurse employed by or under contract with the certifying agency to supervise and monitor the child. The child’s individualized health care plan team may also include, but shall not be limited to, a public health nurse, representatives from the California Children’s Services Program or the Child Health and Disability Prevention Program, regional centers, the county mental health department, and where reunification is the goal, the parent or parents, if available. In addition, if the child is in a specialized foster care home, the individualized health care plan team may include the prospective specialized foster parents, who shall not participate in any team decision pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 17731 or pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or clause (i) of
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), of Section 17732.

(e) “Director” means the Director of Social Services.

(f) “Level of care” means a description of the specialized in-home health care to be provided to a child with special health care needs by the foster family.

(g) Medical conditions requiring specialized in-home health care require dependency upon one or more of the following: enteral feeding tube, total parenteral feeding, a cardiorespiratory monitor, intravenous therapy, a ventilator, oxygen support, urinary catheterization, renal dialysis, ministrations imposed by tracheostomy, colostomy, ileostomy, or other medical or surgical procedures or special medication regimens, including injection, and
 intravenous medication.

(h) “Specialized in-home health care” includes, but is not limited to, those services identified by the child’s primary physician as
 appropriately administered in the home by any one of the following:

(1) A foster parent trained by health care professionals where the child is being placed in, or is currently in, a specialized foster care home.

(2) Group home staff trained by health care professionals pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child where the child was placed in the home as of November 1, 1993, and who is currently in the home.

(3) A health care professional, where the child is placed in a group home after November 1, 1993. The health care services provided pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reimbursable costs for the purpose of determining the group home rate under Section 11462.

(4) A health care professional where the child is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program. The health care services provided pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reimbursable costs for the purpose of determining the short-term residential therapeutic program rate under Section 11462.

(i) “Specialized foster care home” means any of the following foster homes where the foster parents reside in the home and have been trained to provide specialized in-home health care to foster children:

(1) Licensed foster family homes, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Licensed small family
 homes, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Certified family homes, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code, that have accepted placement of a child with special health care needs who is under the supervision and monitoring of a registered nurse employed by, or on contract with, the foster family agency.

(4) Resource families, as defined in Section 16519.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 114.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Resources for Children with Special Health Care Needs [17720. - 17720.]

17720.

The California Health and Human Services Agency shall designate a department to coordinate sources of funding and services not under the jurisdiction of the department which are available to children with special health care needs in order to maximize the health and social services provided to these children and avoid duplication of programs and funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 66.5.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Foster Care [17730. - 17739.]

17730.

(a) The department shall develop a program to establish specialized foster care homes for children with special health care needs to receive specialized in-home health care administered by the persons specified in subdivision (h) of Section 17710. The department shall limit the use of group homes and short-term residential therapeutic programs for children with special health care needs pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 17732. The program shall conform to the requirements set forth in this chapter, and shall be integrated with the foster care and child welfare services programs authorized by Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4.

(b) The department, in administering the licensing program and resource family approval program, shall not evaluate or have any responsibility for the evaluation of the specialized in-home health care provided in specialized foster care homes, group homes, or short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(c) This program shall be conducted by county welfare departments in conformance with procedures established by the department in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 115.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17731.

(a) The county shall develop a plan to place children with special health care needs in foster care. This plan shall be submitted to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, not later than April 1, 1990, before beginning placement of children with special health care needs in specialized foster care homes. This subdivision shall not invalidate any placement made before April 1, 1990. A county that has not submitted a plan by April 1, 1990, shall not continue to make placements of children with special health care needs until the plan has been submitted.

(b) Unless a local lead agency has been designated within the county, as described in Item 4260-113-890 of the Budget Act of 1989, the county department of social
 services shall be the lead agency with the responsibility of developing the plan to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a). The county plan shall be formalized in an interagency agreement between the county department of social services and the other county and private agencies that are the involved parties.

(c) The county plan shall meet all the requirements specified in this subdivision. The regional center shall not be required to submit a plan. However, all requirements specified in this subdivision shall be met prior to a regional center placement of a child who is not a court dependent and who has special health care needs.

(1) (A) Prior
 to the placement of a child with special health care needs, an individualized health care plan, which may be the hospital discharge plan, shall be prepared for the child and, if necessary, in-home health support services shall be arranged. The individualized health care plan team shall be convened by the county department of social services caseworker or the regional center caseworker, to discuss the specific responsibilities of the person or persons specified in subdivision (h) of Section 17710 for provision of in-home health care in accordance with the individualized health care plan developed by the child’s physician or their designee. The plan may also include the identification of any available and funded medical services that are to be provided to the child in the home, including, but not limited to, assistance from registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, public health nurses, physical therapists, and respite care workers. The individualized health care plan team shall delineate in the individualized health care plan the coordination of health and related services for the child and the appropriate number of hours needed to be provided by any health care professional designated to monitor the child’s individualized health care plan pursuant to paragraph (8), including, if the child is in a certified home, the registered nurse employed by or on contract with the foster family agency to supervise and monitor the child.

(B) If the child’s placement is in a Group Home for Children with Special Health Care Needs, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4684.50, the individualized health care plan shall include all of the requirements under subdivision (a) of Section 4684.68.

(2) A child welfare services case plan or regional center individual program plan shall be developed in accordance with applicable regulations, and arrangements made for nonmedical support services.

(3) Foster parents shall be trained by health care professionals pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child being placed in, or currently in, foster care. Additional training shall be provided as needed during the placement of the child and to the child’s biological parent or parents if the child is being reunified with the child’s family.

(4) Children with special health care needs shall be placed in the home of the prospective foster parent subsequent to training by a health care professional pursuant to the discharge plan of the facility releasing the child being placed in foster care.

(5) Assistant caregivers, on-call assistants, respite care workers, and other personnel caring for children with special health care needs shall complete training or additional training by a health care professional in accordance with paragraph (3).

(6) A
 foster parent who is a health care professional or staff member who is a health care professional shall not be required to complete any training or additional training determined by the responsible individualized health care plan team to be unnecessary on the basis of their professional qualification and expertise.

(7) No health care professional shall provide in-home health care to any child with special health care needs placed in a group home after November 1, 1993, unless the individual health care plan team for the child:

(A) Documents that the health care professional has the necessary qualifications and expertise to meet the child’s in-home health care needs.

(B) Updates the documentation provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) each time the child’s special health care needs change.

(8) Specialized foster care homes, group homes, and
 short-term residential therapeutic programs caring for children with special health care needs shall be monitored by the county or regional center according to applicable regulations. The health care plan for each child with special health care needs shall designate which health care professional shall monitor the child’s ongoing health care, including in-home health care provided by persons specified in subdivision (h) of Section 17710. Where the child is placed in a certified home, the designated health care professional shall be the registered nurse employed by or on contract with the foster family agency to supervise and monitor the child.

(9) The workload of the health care professional supervising or monitoring a child’s ongoing health care in a certified home shall be based on the cumulative total hours specified in the individualized health care plans for children assigned to the health care professional. In no case shall the health
 care professional’s regular workload based on the cumulative total hours specified in the individualized health care plans for children assigned to the health care professional be more than 40 hours per week.

(10) The child’s individualized health care plan shall be reassessed at least every six months during the time the child is placed in the specialized foster care home, to ensure that specialized care payments are appropriate to meet the child’s health care needs.

(11) The placement agencies shall coordinate the sources of funding and services available to children with special health care needs in order to maximize the social services provided to these children and to avoid duplication of programs and funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 61.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17732.

(a) No more than two children with or without special health care needs shall reside in a specialized foster care home with the following exceptions:

(1) A specialized foster care home may have a third child with or without special health care needs placed in that home provided that the capacity, as determined by the department or county pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or Article 2 (commencing with Section 16519.5) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 is not exceeded and provided that all of the following conditions have been met:

(A) The child’s placement worker has determined and documented that no other placement is available.

(B) For each child in placement and the child to be placed, the child’s placement worker has determined that the child’s psychological and social needs will be met by placement in the home and has documented that determination. New determinations shall be made and documented each time there is an increase or turnover in children placed in the specialized foster care home and the two-child capacity limit is exceeded.

(C) The individualized health care plan team responsible for the ongoing care of each child with special health care needs involved has considered the number of adoptive, biological, and foster children, and children in guardianship living in the home and determined that the two-child limit may be exceeded without jeopardizing the health and safety of that child, and has documented that determination. New determinations shall be made and documented each time there is
 an increase or turnover in children placed in the specialized foster care home and the two-child capacity limit is exceeded.

(2) A licensed small family home may exceed the two-child placement limit and accept children with or without special health care needs up to capacity, as determined by the department pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, if the conditions in paragraph (1) have been met for both the third foster child and each foster child placed thereafter, and the following additional conditions have been met:

(A) At least one of the children in the facility is a regional center client monitored in accordance with Section 56001 and following of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Whenever four or more children are physically present
 in the facility, the licensee of the small family home has the assistance of a caregiver to provide specialized in-home health care to the children except that:

(i) Night assistance shall not be required for those hours that the individualized health care plan team for each child with special health care needs has documented that the child will not require specialized medical services during that time.

(ii) The department may determine that additional assistance is required to provide appropriate care and supervision for all children in placement. The determination shall only be made after consultation with the appropriate regional center and any appropriate individual health care teams.

(C) On-call assistance is available at all times to respond in case of an emergency. The on-call assistant shall meet the
 requirements of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 17731.

(D) The home is sufficient in size to accommodate the needs of all children in the home.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1523.1 of the Health and Safety Code, a foster family home that has more than three children with special health care needs in its care as of January 1, 1992, and that applies for licensure as a small family home in order to continue to provide care for those children, shall be exempt from the application fee.

(c) Except for children with special health care needs placed in group homes before January 1, 1992, or placed in a group home for children with special health care needs, as defined in paragraph (22) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, a child with special health care needs shall not be placed in any group home, short-term residential therapeutic programs, or combination of group homes, or combination of short-term residential therapeutic programs, for longer than a short-term placement of 120 calendar days. The short-term placement in the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program shall be on an emergency basis for the purpose of arranging a subsequent placement in a less restrictive setting, such as with the child’s natural parents or relatives, with a foster parent or foster family agency, or with another appropriate person or facility. The 120-day limitation shall not be extended, except by the approval of the director or their designee. For children placed after January 1, 1992, the 120-day limitation shall begin on the effective date of the amendments to this section made during the 1993 portion of the 1993–94 Regular Session.

(d) A child with special health care needs shall not be placed in a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program unless the child’s placement worker has determined and documented that the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program has a program that meets the specific needs of the child being placed and there is a commonalty of needs with the other children in the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the
 amendments to this section made by the act that added this subdivision are declaratory of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 62.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17732.1.
